Illinois, session 104th, SB1994.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Credit Union Act is amended by 5changing Sections 10, 19, 29, 34, and 63 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 305/10)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4411)7    Sec. 10. Credit union records; member financial records. 8    (1) A credit union shall establish and maintain books, 9records, accounting systems and procedures which accurately 10reflect its operations and which enable the Department to 11readily ascertain the true financial condition of the credit 12union and whether it is complying with this Act.13    (2) A photostatic or photographic reproduction of any 14credit union records shall be admissible as evidence of 15transactions with the credit union. 16    (3)(a) For the purpose of this Section, the term 17"financial records" means any original, any copy, or any 18summary of (1) a document granting signature authority over an 19account, (2) a statement, ledger card or other record on any 20account which shows each transaction in or with respect to 21that account, (3) a check, draft or money order drawn on a 22financial institution or other entity or issued and payable by 23or through a financial institution or other entity, or (4) any   SB1994 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1other item containing information pertaining to any 2relationship established in the ordinary course of business 3between a credit union and its member, including financial 4statements or other financial information provided by the 5member. 6    (b) This Section does not prohibit:7        (1) The preparation, examination, handling or 8    maintenance of any financial records by any officer, 9    employee or agent of a credit union having custody of such 10    records, or the examination of such records by a certified 11    public accountant engaged by the credit union to perform 12    an independent audit.13        (2) The examination of any financial records by or the 14    furnishing of financial records by a credit union to any 15    officer, employee or agent of the Department, the National 16    Credit Union Administration, Federal Reserve board or any 17    insurer of share accounts for use solely in the exercise 18    of his duties as an officer, employee or agent.19        (3) The publication of data furnished from financial 20    records relating to members where the data cannot be 21    identified to any particular customer of account.22        (4) The making of reports or returns required under 23    Chapter 61 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954.24        (5) Furnishing information concerning the dishonor of 25    any negotiable instrument permitted to be disclosed under 26    the Uniform Commercial Code.  SB1994 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1        (6) The exchange in the regular course of business of 2    (i) credit information between a credit union and other 3    credit unions or financial institutions or commercial 4    enterprises, directly or through a consumer reporting 5    agency or (ii) financial records or information derived 6    from financial records between a credit union and other 7    credit unions or financial institutions or commercial 8    enterprises for the purpose of conducting due diligence 9    pursuant to a merger or a purchase or sale of assets or 10    liabilities of the credit union.11        (7) The furnishing of information to the appropriate 12    law enforcement authorities where the credit union 13    reasonably believes it has been the victim of a crime.14        (8) The furnishing of information pursuant to the 15    Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.16        (9) The furnishing of information pursuant to the 17    Illinois Income Tax Act and the Illinois Estate and 18    Generation-Skipping Transfer Tax Act.19        (10) The furnishing of information pursuant to the 20    federal Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act, 21    Title 31, United States Code, Section 1051 et sequentia.22        (11) The furnishing of information pursuant to any 23    other statute which by its terms or by regulations 24    promulgated thereunder requires the disclosure of 25    financial records other than by subpoena, summons, warrant 26    or court order.  SB1994 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1        (12) The furnishing of information in accordance with 2    the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity 3    Reconciliation Act of 1996. Any credit union governed by 4    this Act shall enter into an agreement for data exchanges 5    with a State agency provided the State agency pays to the 6    credit union a reasonable fee not to exceed its actual 7    cost incurred. A credit union providing information in 8    accordance with this item shall not be liable to any 9    account holder or other person for any disclosure of 10    information to a State agency, for encumbering or 11    surrendering any assets held by the credit union in 12    response to a lien or order to withhold and deliver issued 13    by a State agency, or for any other action taken pursuant 14    to this item, including individual or mechanical errors, 15    provided the action does not constitute gross negligence 16    or willful misconduct. A credit union shall have no 17    obligation to hold, encumber, or surrender assets until it 18    has been served with a subpoena, summons, warrant, court 19    or administrative order, lien, or levy.20        (13) The furnishing of information to law enforcement 21    authorities, the Illinois Department on Aging and its 22    regional administrative and provider agencies, the 23    Department of Human Services Office of Inspector General, 24    or public guardians: (i) upon subpoena by the 25    investigatory entity or the guardian, or (ii) if there is 26    suspicion by the credit union that a member who is an   SB1994 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1    elderly person or person with a disability has been or may 2    become the victim of financial exploitation. For the 3    purposes of this item (13), the term: (i) "elderly person" 4    means a person who is 60 or more years of age, (ii) "person 5    with a disability" means a person who has or reasonably 6    appears to the credit union to have a physical or mental 7    disability that impairs his or her ability to seek or 8    obtain protection from or prevent financial exploitation, 9    and (iii) "financial exploitation" means tortious or 10    illegal use of the assets or resources of an elderly 11    person or person with a disability, and includes, without 12    limitation, misappropriation of the elderly or disabled 13    person's assets or resources by undue influence, breach of 14    fiduciary relationship, intimidation, fraud, deception, 15    extortion, or the use of assets or resources in any manner 16    contrary to law. A credit union or person furnishing 17    information pursuant to this item (13) shall be entitled 18    to the same rights and protections as a person furnishing 19    information under the Adult Protective Services Act and 20    the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.21        (13.5) The furnishing of information to any person on 22    a list submitted and periodically updated by a member who 23    is an elderly person or person with a disability, if there 24    is suspicion by the credit union that the member has been 25    or may become a victim of financial exploitation. For 26    purposes of this item (13.5), the terms "elderly person",   SB1994 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1    "person with a disability", and "financial exploitation" 2    have the meanings given to those terms in item (13). The 3    credit union may convey the suspicion to any of the 4    following persons, if the person is not the suspected 5    perpetrator: (i) any person on the list; (ii) any 6    co-owner, additional authorized signatory, or beneficiary 7    on the account of the member; or (iii) any person known by 8    the credit union to be a family member, including a 9    parent, spouse, adult child, or sibling. When providing 10    information under this item (13.5), the credit union shall 11    limit the information and only disclose that the credit 12    union has cause to suspect that the member may be a victim 13    or target of financial exploitation and the basis or bases 14    of the credit union's reasonable suspicion, without 15    disclosing any other details or confidential information 16    regarding the financial affairs of the member. Any 17    disclosure made pursuant to this subsection shall comply 18    with all other privacy laws and legal prohibitions, 19    including confidentiality requirements for suspicious 20    activity reports. The credit union may rely on information 21    provided by the member in compiling the list of contact 22    persons. The credit union and any employee of the credit 23    union acting in good faith is immune from all criminal, 24    civil, and administrative liability for contacting a 25    person or electing not to contact a person under this item 26    (13.5) and for actions taken in furtherance of that   SB1994 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1    determination, if the determination was made based on a 2    reasonable suspicion. 3        (14) The disclosure of financial records or 4    information as necessary to effect, administer, or enforce 5    a transaction requested or authorized by the member, or in 6    connection with:7            (A) servicing or processing a financial product or 8        service requested or authorized by the member;9            (B) maintaining or servicing a member's account 10        with the credit union; or11            (C) a proposed or actual securitization or 12        secondary market sale (including sales of servicing 13        rights) related to a transaction of a member.14        Nothing in this item (14), however, authorizes the 15    sale of the financial records or information of a member 16    without the consent of the member.17        (15) The disclosure of financial records or 18    information as necessary to protect against or prevent 19    actual or potential fraud, unauthorized transactions, 20    claims, or other liability.21        (16)(a) The disclosure of financial records or 22    information related to a private label credit program 23    between a financial institution and a private label party 24    in connection with that private label credit program. Such 25    information is limited to outstanding balance, available 26    credit, payment and performance and account history,   SB1994 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1    product references, purchase information, and information 2    related to the identity of the customer.3        (b)(1) For purposes of this item (16), "private label 4    credit program" means a credit program involving a 5    financial institution and a private label party that is 6    used by a customer of the financial institution and the 7    private label party primarily for payment for goods or 8    services sold, manufactured, or distributed by a private 9    label party.10        (2) For purposes of this item (16), "private label 11    party" means, with respect to a private label credit 12    program, any of the following: a retailer, a merchant, a 13    manufacturer, a trade group, or any such person's 14    affiliate, subsidiary, member, agent, or service provider.15        (17)(a) The furnishing of financial records of a 16    member to the Department to aid the Department's initial 17    determination or subsequent re-determination of the 18    member's eligibility for Medicaid and Medicaid long-term 19    care benefits for long-term care services, provided that 20    the credit union receives the written consent and 21    authorization of the member, which shall:22            (1) have the member's signature notarized;23            (2) be signed by at least one witness who 24        certifies that he or she believes the member to be of 25        sound mind and memory;26            (3) be tendered to the credit union at the   SB1994 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1        earliest practicable time following its execution, 2        certification, and notarization;3            (4) specifically limit the disclosure of the 4        member's financial records to the Department; and5            (5) be in substantially the following form:  6CUSTOMER CONSENT AND AUTHORIZATION 7FOR RELEASE OF FINANCIAL RECORDS  8I, ......................................., hereby authorize 9       (Name of Customer)  10............................................................. 11(Name of Financial Institution) 12............................................................. 13(Address of Financial Institution) 14to disclose the following financial records: 15any and all information concerning my deposit, savings, money 16market, certificate of deposit, individual retirement, 17retirement plan, 401(k) plan, incentive plan, employee benefit 18plan, mutual fund and loan accounts (including, but not 19limited to, any indebtedness or obligation for which I am a 20co-borrower, co-obligor, guarantor, or surety), and any and   SB1994 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1all other accounts in which I have an interest and any other 2information regarding me in the possession of the Financial 3Institution, 4to the Illinois Department of Human Services or the Illinois 5Department of Healthcare and Family Services, or both ("the 6Department"), for the following purpose(s): 7to aid in the initial determination or re-determination by the 8State of Illinois of my eligibility for Medicaid long-term 9care benefits, pursuant to applicable law.  10I understand that this Consent and Authorization may be 11revoked by me in writing at any time before my financial 12records, as described above, are disclosed, and that this 13Consent and Authorization is valid until the Financial 14Institution receives my written revocation. This Consent and 15Authorization shall constitute valid authorization for the 16Department identified above to inspect all such financial 17records set forth above, and to request and receive copies of 18such financial records from the Financial Institution (subject 19to such records search and reproduction reimbursement policies 20as the Financial Institution may have in place). An executed 21copy of this Consent and Authorization shall be sufficient and 22as good as the original and permission is hereby granted to 23honor a photostatic or electronic copy of this Consent and   SB1994 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1Authorization. Disclosure is strictly limited to the 2Department identified above and no other person or entity 3shall receive my financial records pursuant to this Consent 4and Authorization. By signing this form, I agree to indemnify 5and hold the Financial Institution harmless from any and all 6claims, demands, and losses, including reasonable attorneys 7fees and expenses, arising from or incurred in its reliance on 8this Consent and Authorization. As used herein, "Customer" 9shall mean "Member" if the Financial Institution is a credit 10union. 11....................... ...................... 12(Date)                  (Signature of Customer)              13                         ...................... 14                         ...................... 15                         (Address of Customer)  16                         ...................... 17                         (Customer's birth date) 18                         (month/day/year)  19The undersigned witness certifies that ................., 20known to me to be the same person whose name is subscribed as 21the customer to the foregoing Consent and Authorization, 22appeared before me and the notary public and acknowledged   SB1994 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1signing and delivering the instrument as his or her free and 2voluntary act for the uses and purposes therein set forth. I 3believe him or her to be of sound mind and memory. The 4undersigned witness also certifies that the witness is not an 5owner, operator, or relative of an owner or operator of a 6long-term care facility in which the customer is a patient or 7resident.  8Dated: ................. ...................... 9                         (Signature of Witness)  10                         ...................... 11                         (Print Name of Witness)  12                         ...................... 13                         ...................... 14                         (Address of Witness)  15State of Illinois)16                 ) ss.17County of .......) 18The undersigned, a notary public in and for the above county 19and state, certifies that .........., known to me to be the 20same person whose name is subscribed as the customer to the 21foregoing Consent and Authorization, appeared before me   SB1994 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1together with the witness, .........., in person and 2acknowledged signing and delivering the instrument as the free 3and voluntary act of the customer for the uses and purposes 4therein set forth.  5Dated:....................................................... 6Notary Public:............................................... 7My commission expires:.......................................  8        (b) In no event shall the credit union distribute the 9    member's financial records to the long-term care facility 10    from which the member seeks initial or continuing 11    residency or long-term care services.12        (c) A credit union providing financial records of a 13    member in good faith relying on a consent and 14    authorization executed and tendered in accordance with 15    this item (17) shall not be liable to the member or any 16    other person in relation to the credit union's disclosure 17    of the member's financial records to the Department. The 18    member signing the consent and authorization shall 19    indemnify and hold the credit union harmless that relies 20    in good faith upon the consent and authorization and 21    incurs a loss because of such reliance. The credit union 22    recovering under this indemnification provision shall also 23    be entitled to reasonable attorney's fees and the expenses 24    of recovery.  SB1994 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1        (d) A credit union shall be reimbursed by the member 2    for all costs reasonably necessary and directly incurred 3    in searching for, reproducing, and disclosing a member's 4    financial records required or requested to be produced 5    pursuant to any consent and authorization executed under 6    this item (17). The requested financial records shall be 7    delivered to the Department within 10 days after receiving 8    a properly executed consent and authorization or at the 9    earliest practicable time thereafter if the requested 10    records cannot be delivered within 10 days, but delivery 11    may be delayed until the final reimbursement of all costs 12    is received by the credit union. The credit union may 13    honor a photostatic or electronic copy of a properly 14    executed consent and authorization.15        (e) Nothing in this item (17) shall impair, abridge, 16    or abrogate the right of a member to:17            (1) directly disclose his or her financial records 18        to the Department or any other person; or19            (2) authorize his or her attorney or duly 20        appointed agent to request and obtain the member's 21        financial records and disclose those financial records 22        to the Department.23        (f) For purposes of this item (17), "Department" means 24    the Department of Human Services and the Department of 25    Healthcare and Family Services or any successor 26    administrative agency of either agency.   SB1994 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1        (18) The furnishing of the financial records of a 2    member to an appropriate law enforcement authority, 3    without prior notice to or consent of the member, upon 4    written request of the law enforcement authority, when 5    reasonable suspicion of an imminent threat to the personal 6    security and safety of the member exists that necessitates 7    an expedited release of the member's financial records, as 8    determined by the law enforcement authority. The law 9    enforcement authority shall include a brief explanation of 10    the imminent threat to the member in its written request 11    to the credit union. The written request shall reflect 12    that it has been authorized by a supervisory or managerial 13    official of the law enforcement authority. The decision to 14    furnish the financial records of a member to a law 15    enforcement authority shall be made by a supervisory or 16    managerial official of the credit union. A credit union 17    providing information in accordance with this item (18) 18    shall not be liable to the member or any other person for 19    the disclosure of the information to the law enforcement 20    authority. 21    (c) Except as otherwise provided by this Act, a credit 22union may not disclose to any person, except to the member or 23his duly authorized agent, any financial records relating to 24that member of the credit union unless:25        (1) the member has authorized disclosure to the 26    person;  SB1994 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1        (2) the financial records are disclosed in response to 2    a lawful subpoena, summons, warrant, citation to discover 3    assets, or court order that meets the requirements of 4    subparagraph (3)(d) of this Section; or5        (3) the credit union is attempting to collect an 6    obligation owed to the credit union and the credit union 7    complies with the provisions of Section 2I of the Consumer 8    Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. 9    (d) A credit union shall disclose financial records under 10item (3)(c)(2) of this Section pursuant to a lawful subpoena, 11summons, warrant, citation to discover assets, or court order 12only after the credit union sends a copy of the subpoena, 13summons, warrant, citation to discover assets, or court order 14to the person establishing the relationship with the credit 15union, if living, and otherwise the person's personal 16representative, if known, at the person's last known address 17by first class mail, postage prepaid, through a third-party 18commercial carrier or courier with delivery charge fully 19prepaid, by hand delivery, or by electronic delivery at an 20email address on file with the credit union (if the person 21establishing the relationship with the credit union has 22consented to receive electronic delivery and, if the person 23establishing the relationship with the credit union is a 24consumer, the person has consented under the consumer consent 25provisions set forth in Section 7001 of Title 15 of the United 26States Code), unless the credit union is specifically   SB1994 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1prohibited from notifying the person by order of court or by 2applicable State or federal law. In the case of a grand jury 3subpoena, a credit union shall not mail a copy of a subpoena to 4any person pursuant to this subsection if the subpoena was 5issued by a grand jury under the Statewide Grand Jury Act or 6notifying the person would constitute a violation of the 7federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978. 8    (e)(1) Any officer or employee of a credit union who 9knowingly and willfully furnishes financial records in 10violation of this Section is guilty of a business offense and 11upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than $1,000. 12    (2) Any person who knowingly and willfully induces or 13attempts to induce any officer or employee of a credit union to 14disclose financial records in violation of this Section is 15guilty of a business offense and upon conviction thereof shall 16be fined not more than $1,000. 17    (f) A credit union shall be reimbursed for costs which are 18reasonably necessary and which have been directly incurred in 19searching for, reproducing or transporting books, papers, 20records or other data of a member required or requested to be 21produced pursuant to a lawful subpoena, summons, warrant, 22citation to discover assets, or court order. The Secretary and 23the Director may determine, by rule, the rates and conditions 24under which payment shall be made. Delivery of requested 25documents may be delayed until final reimbursement of all 26costs is received.  SB1994 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-873, eff. 5-13-22.) 2    (205 ILCS 305/19)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4420)3    Sec. 19. Meeting of members. 4    (1)(a) The annual meeting shall be held each year during 5the months of January, February or March or such other month as 6may be approved by the Department. The meeting shall be held at 7the time, place and in the manner set forth in the bylaws. Any 8special meetings of the members of the credit union shall be 9held at the time, place and in the manner set forth in the 10bylaws. Unless otherwise set forth in this Act, quorum 11requirements for meetings of members shall be established by a 12credit union in its bylaws. Notice of all meetings must be 13given by the secretary of the credit union at least 7 days 14before the date of such meeting, either by handing a written or 15printed notice to each member of the credit union, by mailing 16the notice to the member at his address as listed on the books 17and records of the credit union, by posting a notice of the 18meeting in three conspicuous places, including the office of 19the credit union, by posting the notice of the meeting on the 20credit union's website, or by disclosing the notice of the 21meeting in membership newsletters or account statements.22    (b) Unless expressly prohibited by the articles of 23incorporation or bylaws and subject to applicable requirements 24of this Act, the board of directors may provide by resolution 25that members may attend, participate in, act in, and vote at   SB1994 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1any annual meeting or special meeting through the use of a 2conference telephone or interactive technology, including, but 3not limited to, electronic transmission, internet usage, or 4remote communication, by means of which all persons 5participating in the meeting can communicate with each other. 6Participation through the use of a conference telephone or 7interactive technology shall constitute attendance, presence, 8and representation in person at the annual meeting or special 9meeting of the person or persons so participating and count 10towards the quorum required to conduct business at the 11meeting. The following conditions shall apply to any virtual 12meeting of the members:13        (i) the credit union must internally possess or retain 14    the technological capacity to facilitate virtual meeting 15    attendance, participation, communication, and voting; and16        (ii) the members must receive notice of the use of a 17    virtual meeting format and appropriate instructions for 18    joining, participating, and voting during the virtual 19    meeting at least 7 days before the virtual meeting. 20    (2) On all questions and at all elections, except election 21of directors, each member has one vote regardless of the 22number of his shares. There shall be no voting by proxy except 23on the election of directors, proposals for merger or 24voluntary dissolution. Members may vote on questions, 25including, without limitation, the approval of mergers and 26voluntary dissolutions under this Act, and in elections by   SB1994 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1electronic record if approved by the board of directors. 2Members shall have the right to vote on all such questions in 3person by written ballot. All voting on the election of 4directors shall be by ballot, but when there is no contest, 5written or electronic ballots need not be cast. The record 6date to be used for the purpose of determining which members 7are entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of members, 8may be fixed in advance by the directors on a date not more 9than 90 days nor less than 10 days prior to the date of the 10meeting. If no record date is fixed by the directors, the first 11day on which notice of the meeting is given, mailed or posted 12is the record date.13    (3) Regardless of the number of shares owned by a society, 14association, club, partnership, other credit union or 15corporation, having membership in the credit union, it shall 16be entitled to only one vote and it may be represented and have 17its vote cast by its designated agent acting on its behalf 18pursuant to a resolution adopted by the organization's board 19of directors or similar governing authority; provided that the 20credit union shall obtain a certified copy of such resolution 21before such vote may be cast.22    (4) A member may revoke a proxy by delivery to the credit 23union of a written statement to that effect, by execution of a 24subsequently dated proxy, by execution of an electronic 25record, or by attendance at a meeting and voting in person. 26    (5) The use of electronic records for member voting   SB1994 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1pursuant to this Section shall employ a security procedure 2that meets the attribution criteria set forth in Section 9 of 3the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act. 4    (6) As used in this Section, "electronic", "electronic 5record", and "security procedure" have the meanings ascribed 6to those terms in the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.7(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-496, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-774, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 96-30-23.) 10    (205 ILCS 305/29)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4430)11    Sec. 29. Meetings of directors. 12    (1) The board of directors and the executive committee 13shall meet as often as necessary, but one body must meet at 14least monthly and the other at least quarterly, as prescribed 15in the bylaws. Unless a greater number is required by the 16bylaws, a majority of the whole board of directors shall 17constitute a quorum. The act of a majority of the directors 18present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the 19act of the board of directors unless the act of a greater 20number is required by this Act, the credit union's articles of 21incorporation or the bylaws.22    (1.5) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in 23subsection (1), the board of directors of a credit union with a 24composite rating of either 1 or 2 under the Uniform Financial 25Institutions Rating System known as the CAMELS supervisory   SB1994 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1rating system (or an equivalent rating under a comparable 2rating system) and a management rating under such composite 3rating of either 1 or 2 may meet not less than 6 times 4annually, with at least one meeting held during each fiscal 5quarter. This meeting frequency schedule shall be available to 6an eligible credit union irrespective of whether it has 7appointed an executive committee pursuant to Section 28. 8    (1.7) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (1.5), the board 9of directors of a credit union with $50,000,000 or more in 10assets, a composite rating of either 1 or 2 under the Uniform 11Financial Institutions Rating System known as the CAMELS 12supervisory rating system (or an equivalent rating under a 13comparable rating system), and a management rating under the 14composite rating of either 1 or 2 may meet no fewer than 4 15times annually, with at least one meeting held during each 16fiscal quarter. The board of directors of a credit union with 17less than $50,000,000 in assets, but with the composite and 18management ratings referenced in this subsection, may meet no 19fewer than 4 times annually, with at least one meeting held 20during each fiscal quarter, upon prior written approval of the 21Secretary. The meeting frequency schedule set forth in this 22subsection shall be available to an eligible credit union, 23irrespective of whether it has appointed an executive 24committee pursuant to Section 28. 25    (2) Unless specifically prohibited by the articles of 26incorporation or bylaws, directors and committee members may   SB1994 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1participate in and act at any meeting of the board or committee 2through the use of a conference telephone or other 3communications equipment by means of which all persons 4participating in the meeting can communicate with each other. 5Participation in the meeting shall constitute attendance and 6presence in person at the meeting of the person or persons so 7participating.8    (3) Unless specifically prohibited by the articles of 9incorporation or bylaws, any action required by this Act to be 10taken at a meeting of the board of directors or a committee and 11any other action that may be taken at a meeting of the board of 12directors or a committee may be taken without a meeting if a 13consent in writing setting forth the action taken is signed by 14all the directors entitled to vote with respect to the subject 15matter thereof, or by all members of the committee, as the case 16may be. The consent shall be evidenced by one or more written 17approvals, each of which sets forth the action taken and bears 18the signatures of one or more directors or committee members. 19All the approvals evidencing the consent shall be delivered to 20the secretary to be filed in the corporate records of the 21credit union. The action taken shall be effective when all the 22directors or committee members have approved the consent 23unless the consent specifies a different effective date. A 24consent signed by all the directors or all the members of a 25committee shall have the same effect as a unanimous vote, and 26may be stated as such in any document filed with the director   SB1994 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1under this Act.2    (4)(a) As used in this subsection:3    "Affiliate" means an organization established to serve the 4needs of credit unions, the business of which relates to the 5daily operations of credit unions.6    "Compliance review documents" means reports, meeting 7minutes, and other documents prepared in connection with a 8review or evaluation conducted by or for the board of 9directors.10    (b) This subsection applies to the board of directors in 11relation to its functions to evaluate and seek to improve any 12of the following:13        (i) loan policies or underwriting standards;14        (ii) asset quality;15        (iii) financial reporting to federal or State 16    governmental or regulatory agencies; or17        (iv) compliance with federal or State statutory or 18    regulatory requirements, including, without limitation, 19    the manner in which it performs its duties under Section 20    30.21    (c) Meetings, minutes of meetings, and reports of the 22board of directors shall be subject to the confidentiality and 23redaction standards set forth in this subsection.24    (d) Except as provided in paragraph (e), compliance review 25documents and the deliberations of the board of directors are 26confidential. An affiliate of a credit union, a credit union   SB1994 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1regulatory agency, and the insurer of credit union share 2accounts shall have access to compliance review documents; 3however, (i) the documents remain confidential and (ii) 4delivery of compliance review documents to an affiliate or 5pursuant to the requirements of a credit union regulatory 6agency or an insurer of credit union share accounts do not 7constitute a waiver of the confidentiality granted in this 8Section.9    (e) This Section does not apply to any civil or 10administrative action initiated by a credit union regulatory 11agency or an insurer of credit union share accounts.12    (f) This Section shall not be construed to limit the 13discovery or admissibility in any civil action of any 14documents, including compliance review documents.15    (g) Any report required under this Act to be furnished to 16the board of directors by the membership committee, credit 17committee, or any other committee may be submitted in a 18summary format that redacts personally identifiable 19information as defined under applicable State and federal law. 20    (h) Compliance review documents may be disclosed by the 21Secretary or a credit union to any person or entity to whom 22confidential supervisory information may be disclosed pursuant 23to subsection (3) of Section 9.1. 24(Source: P.A. 103-289, eff. 7-28-23.) 25    (205 ILCS 305/34)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4435)  SB1994 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1    Sec. 34. Duties of supervisory committee. 2    (1) The supervisory committee shall make or cause to be 3made an annual internal audit of the books and affairs of the 4credit union to determine that the credit union's accounting 5records and reports are prepared promptly and accurately 6reflect operations and results, that internal controls are 7established and effectively maintained to safeguard the assets 8of the credit union, and that the policies, procedures and 9practices established by the board of directors and management 10of the credit union are being properly administered. The 11supervisory committee shall submit a report of that audit to 12the board of directors and a summary of that report to the 13members at the next annual meeting of the credit union. It 14shall make or cause to be made such supplementary audits as it 15deems necessary or as are required by the Secretary or by the 16board of directors, and submit reports of these supplementary 17audits to the Secretary or board of directors as applicable. 18If the supervisory committee has not engaged a licensed 19certified public accountant or licensed certified public 20accounting firm to make the internal audit, the supervisory 21committee or other officials of the credit union shall not 22indicate or in any manner imply that such audit has been 23performed by a licensed certified public accountant or 24licensed certified public accounting firm or that the audit 25represents the independent opinion of a licensed certified 26public accountant or licensed certified public accounting   SB1994 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1firm. The supervisory committee must retain its tapes and 2working papers of each internal audit for inspection by the 3Department. The report of this audit must be made on a form 4approved by the Secretary. A copy of the report must be 5promptly delivered to the Secretary as set forth in paragraph 6(C) of subsection (3).7    (2) The supervisory committee shall make or cause to be 8made at least once each year a reasonable percentage 9verification of members' share and loan accounts, consistent 10with rules promulgated by the Secretary.11    (3) (A) The supervisory committee of a credit union with 12assets of $10,000,000 or more shall engage a licensed 13certified public accountant or licensed certified public 14accounting firm to perform an annual external independent 15audit of the credit union's financial statements in accordance 16with generally accepted auditing standards and the financial 17statements shall be issued in accordance with accounting 18principles generally accepted in the United States of America. 19    (B) The supervisory committee of a credit union with 20assets of $5,000,000 or more, but less than $10,000,000 may, 21at its option, shall engage a licensed certified public 22accountant or licensed certified public accounting firm to 23perform on an annual basis: (i) the an agreed-upon procedures 24engagement under attestation standards established by the 25American Institute of Certified Public Accountants to 26minimally satisfy the supervisory committee internal audit   SB1994 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1standards set forth in subsection (1) within the standards 2established by the American Institute of Certified Public 3Accountants; (ii) an external independent audit of the credit 4union's financial statements pursuant to the standards set 5forth in paragraph (A) of subsection (3); or (iii) an external 6independent audit of the credit union's financial statements 7in accordance with subsection (5).8    (C) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Section 6, 9each credit union organized under this Act shall select the 10annual period it desires to use for purposes of performing the 11external independent audit, agreed-upon procedures engagement, 12or internal audit described in this Section. The annual period 13may end on the final day of any month and shall be construed to 14mean once every calendar year and not once every 12-month 15period. Irrespective of the annual period selected, the credit 16union shall complete its external independent audit report, 17agreed-upon procedures report, or internal audit report and 18deliver a copy to the Secretary no later than 120 days after 19the effective date of the audit or engagement, which shall 20mean the last day of the selected annual period. A credit union 21or group of credit unions may obtain an extension of the due 22date upon application to and receipt of written approval from 23the Secretary. 24    (D) If the credit union engages a licensed certified 25public accountant or licensed certified public accounting firm 26to perform an annual (i) external independent audit of the   SB1994 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1credit union's financial statements pursuant to the standards 2in paragraph (A) of subsection (3); (ii) regulatory basis 3financial statement audit pursuant to the standards in 4subsection (5); or (iii) or an annual agreed-upon procedures 5engagement pursuant to the standards in paragraph (B) of 6subsection (3), then the annual internal audit requirements of 7subsection (1) shall be deemed satisfied and met in all 8respects. 9    (4) In determining the appropriate balance in the 10allowance for loan losses account, a credit union may 11determine its historical loss rate using a defined period of 12time of less than 5 years, provided that:13        (A) the methodology used to determine the defined 14    period of time is formally documented in the credit 15    union's policies and procedures and is appropriate to the 16    credit union's size, business strategy, and loan portfolio 17    characteristics and the economic environment of the areas 18    and employers served by the credit union;19        (B) supporting documentation is maintained for the 20    technique used to develop the credit union loss rates, 21    including the period of time used to accumulate historical 22    loss data and the factors considered in establishing the 23    time frames; and24        (C) the external auditor conducting the credit union's 25    financial statement audit has analyzed the methodology 26    employed by the credit union and concludes that the   SB1994 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1    financial statements, including the allowance for loan 2    losses, are fairly stated in all material respects in 3    accordance with U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting 4    Principles, as promulgated by the Financial Accounting 5    Standards Board, or the regulatory basis of accounting 6    identified in subsection (5).7    (5) A credit union with total assets of less than 8$10,000,000 that does not engage a licensed certified public 9accountant or licensed certified public accounting firm to 10perform an annual external independent audit of the credit 11union's financial statements pursuant to the standards in 12paragraph (A) of subsection (3) is not required to determine 13its allowance for loan losses in accordance with generally 14accepted accounting principles. Any such credit union may 15instead use any reasonable reserve methodology, including 16incurred loss, if it adequately covers known and probable loan 17losses and complies with the Department's rule addressing loan 18loss accounting procedures in 38 Ill. Adm. Code 190.70. Any 19such credit union shall also have the option of engaging a 20licensed certified public accountant or licensed certified 21public accounting firm to perform a financial statement audit 22in accordance with this regulatory basis of accounting rather 23than the standards in paragraph (A) of subsection (3). 24    (6) A majority of the members of the supervisory committee 25shall constitute a quorum.26    (7) On an annual basis commencing January 1, 2015, the   SB1994 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1members of the supervisory committee shall receive training 2related to their statutory duties. Supervisory committee 3members may receive the training through internal credit union 4training, external training offered by the credit union's 5retained auditors, trade associations, vendors, regulatory 6agencies, or any other sources or on-the-job experience, or a 7combination of those activities. The training may be received 8through any medium, including, but not limited to, 9conferences, workshops, audit closing meetings, seminars, 10teleconferences, webinars, and other Internet-based delivery 11channels. 12(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-496, eff. 8-20-21; 13102-774, eff. 5-13-22.) 14    (205 ILCS 305/63)  (from Ch. 17, par. 4464)15    Sec. 63. Merger and consolidation. 16    (1) Any two or more credit unions, regardless of whether 17or not they have the same common bond, may merge or consolidate 18into a single credit union. A merger or consolidation may be 19with a credit union organized under the laws of this State or 20of another state or of the United States and is subject to the 21approval of the Secretary. It must be made on such terms as 22have been agreed upon by a vote of a majority of the directors 23present at a meeting of the board of directors of each credit 24union at which a quorum is present, and approved by an 25affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the merging   SB1994 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1credit union being absorbed present at a meeting, either in 2person or by proxy, duly called for that purpose, except as 3hereinafter specified. Notice of the meeting stating the 4purpose must be sent by the secretary Secretary of each 5merging credit union being absorbed to each member by mail or 6electronic record as authorized by Section 10.2 of this Act at 7least 45 but no more than 90 days before the date of the 8meeting, except as specified in this Act.9    (1.5) If the Secretary determines the merging credit union 10is not yet in danger of insolvency but supervisory concerns 11exist as described in this paragraph (1.5), and upon agreement 12of the boards of directors of the merging and continuing 13credit unions as confirmed by a majority vote of the directors 14present at a meeting of each board at which a quorum is 15present, the Secretary may permit the merger to become 16effective without (i) an affirmative vote of the membership of 17the merging credit union otherwise required by paragraph (1) 18of Section 63, (ii) adherence to the merging credit union 19membership meeting notice requirement set forth in subsection 20(1) of Section 63, or (iii) both. For the avoidance of doubt, 21if supervisory concerns exist, the Secretary and both credit 22unions may agree to conduct the merging credit union 23membership meeting, but on a timeline shorter than that 24prescribed in subsection (1) of Section 63. Supervisory 25concerns supporting such a waiver or adjustment of the merging 26credit union membership notice and voting process include   SB1994 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1without limitation, abandonment of management or officials, or 2both, of the merging credit union and the inability to find 3suitable replacements; material loss of sponsor support; 4serious and persistent recordkeeping problems or deficiencies; 5or sustained material decline in financial condition supported 6by at least 12 months of historical data that reflects the 7merging credit union's net worth is declining at a rate that 8will take it under 2% net worth within 18 months. 9    (2) One of the merging credit unions may continue after 10the merger or consolidation either as a surviving credit union 11retaining its identity or as a new credit union as has been 12agreed upon under the terms of the merger. At least 9 members 13of the new proposed credit union must apply to the Department 14for permission to organize the new credit union. The same 15procedure shall be followed as provided for the organization 16of a new credit union.17    (3) After approval by the members of the credit union 18which is to be absorbed by the merger or consolidation, the 19chairman or president and the secretary of each credit union 20shall execute a certificate of merger or consolidation, which 21shall set forth all of the following:22        (a) The time and place of the meeting of each board of 23    directors at which the plan was agreed upon;24        (b) The vote in favor of the adoption of the plan;25        (c) A copy of each resolution or other action by which 26    the plan was agreed upon;  SB1994 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1        (d) The time and place of the meeting of the members of 2    the absorbed credit union at which the plan agreed upon 3    was approved; and,4        (e) The vote by which the plan was approved by the 5    members of the absorbed credit union.6    (4) Such certificate and a copy of the plan of merger or 7consolidation agreed upon shall be mailed to the Secretary for 8review. If the provisions of this Act have been complied with, 9the certificate shall be approved by him, and returned to the 10credit unions which are parties to the merger or consolidation 11within 30 days. When so approved by the Secretary the 12certificate shall constitute the Department's certificate of 13approval of the merger or consolidation.14    (5) Upon issuance of the certificate of approval, each 15merging credit union which was absorbed shall cease operation. 16Each party to the merger shall file the certificate of 17approval with the Recorder or County Clerk of the county in 18which the credit union has or had its principal office.19    (6) Each credit union absorbed by the merger or 20consolidation shall return to the Secretary the original 21statement of incorporation, certificate of approval of 22incorporation, and the bylaws of the credit union. The 23surviving credit union shall continue its operation under its 24existing certificate of approval, articles of incorporation, 25and the bylaws or if a new credit union has been formed, under 26the new certificate of approval, articles of incorporation,   SB1994 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1and bylaws.2    (7) All rights of membership in and any obligation or 3liability of any member to any credit union which is party to a 4consolidation or merger are continued in the surviving or new 5credit union without reservation or diminution.6    (8) A pending action or other judicial proceeding to which 7any of the consolidating or merging credit unions is a party 8does not abate by reason of the consolidation or merger.9(Source: P.A. 101-567, eff. 8-23-19.) 10    Section 10. The Gestational Surrogacy Act is amended by 11changing Section 25 as follows: 12    (750 ILCS 47/25)13    Sec. 25. Requirements for a gestational surrogacy 14contract. 15    (a) A gestational surrogacy contract shall be presumed 16enforceable for purposes of State law only if:17        (1) it meets the contractual requirements set forth in 18    subsection (b) of this Section; and19        (2) it contains at a minimum each of the terms set 20    forth in subsection (c) of this Section.21    (b) A gestational surrogacy contract shall meet the 22following requirements:23        (1) it shall be in writing;24        (2) it shall be executed prior to the commencement of   SB1994 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1    any medical procedures (other than medical or mental 2    health evaluations necessary to determine eligibility of 3    the parties pursuant to Section 20 of this Act) in 4    furtherance of the gestational surrogacy:5            (i) by a gestational surrogate meeting the 6        eligibility requirements of subsection (a) of Section 7        20 of this Act and, if married, the gestational 8        surrogate's husband; and9            (ii) by the intended parent or parents meeting the 10        eligibility requirements of subsection (b) of Section 11        20 of this Act. In the event an intended parent is 12        married, both husband and wife must execute the 13        gestational surrogacy contract;14        (3) each of the gestational surrogate and the intended 15    parent or parents shall have been represented by separate 16    counsel in all matters concerning the gestational 17    surrogacy and the gestational surrogacy contract;18        (3.5) each of the gestational surrogate and the 19    intended parent or parents shall have signed a written 20    acknowledgement that he or she received information about 21    the legal, financial, and contractual rights, 22    expectations, penalties, and obligations of the surrogacy 23    agreement;24        (4) if the gestational surrogacy contract provides for 25    the payment of compensation to the gestational surrogate, 26    the compensation shall have been placed in escrow with an   SB1994 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1    independent escrow agent that is bonded prior to the 2    gestational surrogate's commencement of any medical 3    procedure (other than medical or mental health evaluations 4    necessary to determine the gestational surrogate's 5    eligibility pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 20 of 6    this Act). The independent escrow agent must hold a 7    minimum bond of no less than $1,000,000; and8        (5) it shall be witnessed by 2 competent adults.9    (c) A gestational surrogacy contract shall provide for:10        (1) the express written agreement of the gestational 11    surrogate to:12            (i) undergo pre-embryo transfer and attempt to 13        carry and give birth to the child; and14            (ii) surrender custody of the child to the 15        intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth 16        of the child;17        (2) if the gestational surrogate is married, the 18    express agreement of her husband to:19            (i) undertake the obligations imposed on the 20        gestational surrogate pursuant to the terms of the 21        gestational surrogacy contract;22            (ii) surrender custody of the child to the 23        intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth 24        of the child;25        (3) the right of the gestational surrogate to utilize 26    the services of a physician of her choosing, after   SB1994 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1    consultation with the intended parents, to provide her 2    care during the pregnancy; and3        (4) the express written agreement of the intended 4    parent or parents to:5            (i) accept custody of the child immediately upon 6        his or her birth; and7            (ii) assume sole responsibility for the support of 8        the child immediately upon his or her birth.9    (d) A gestational surrogacy contract shall be presumed 10enforceable for purposes of State law even though it contains 11one or more of the following provisions:12        (1) the gestational surrogate's agreement to undergo 13    all medical exams, treatments, and fetal monitoring 14    procedures that the physician recommended for the success 15    of the pregnancy;16        (2) the gestational surrogate's agreement to abstain 17    from any activities that the intended parent or parents or 18    the physician reasonably believes to be harmful to the 19    pregnancy and future health of the child, including, 20    without limitation, smoking, drinking alcohol, using 21    nonprescribed drugs, using prescription drugs not 22    authorized by a physician aware of the gestational 23    surrogate's pregnancy, exposure to radiation, or any other 24    activities proscribed by a health care provider;25        (3) the agreement of the intended parent or parents to 26    pay the gestational surrogate reasonable compensation; and  SB1994 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 07807 BAB 17853 b1        (4) the agreement of the intended parent or parents to 2    pay for or reimburse the gestational surrogate for 3    reasonable expenses (including, without limitation, 4    medical, legal, or other professional expenses) related to 5    the gestational surrogacy and the gestational surrogacy 6    contract.7    (e) In the event that any of the requirements of this 8Section are not met, a court of competent jurisdiction shall 9determine parentage based on evidence of the parties' intent.10(Source: P.A. 93-921, eff. 1-1-05.)